Washington statutes.
RCW 35.34.010

Legislative intent.

The legislature hereby recognizes that the development and adoption of a budget by a city or town is a lengthy and intense process designed to provide adequate opportunities for public input and sufficient time for deliberation and enactment by the legislative authority. The legislature also recognizes that there are limited amounts of time available and that time committed for budgetary action reduces opportunities for deliberating other issues. It is, therefore, the intent of the legislature to authorize cities and towns to establish by ordinance a biennial budget and to provide the means for modification of such budget. This chapter and chapter 35A.34 RCW shall be known as the municipal biennial budget act.

[ 1985 c 175 s 1.]